Hawaii, session 2025, HB904.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1. The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Require the state public charter school commission, rather than the board of education, to complete an annual report of the State's public charter schools; and (2)  Require the board of education to review and approve the commission's annual report before submission to the governor, legislature, and the public. SECTION 2.  Section 302D-21, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§302D-21 Annual [board] commission report.  [No later than the opening day of each regular session of the legislature, the board] (a)  The commission shall issue to the governor, the legislature, and the public, an annual report on the State's public charter schools, drawing from the annual reports submitted by every authorizer, as well as any additional relevant data compiled by the [board,] commission, for the school year ending in the preceding calendar year.  The annual report shall include: (1)  The [board's] commission's assessment of the successes, challenges, and areas for improvement in meeting the purposes of this chapter, including the [board's] commission's assessment of the sufficiency of funding for public charter schools, and any suggested changes in state law or policy necessary to strengthen the State's public charter schools; (2)  A line-item breakdown of all federal funds received by the department and distributed to authorizers; (3)  Any concerns regarding equity and recommendations to improve access to and distribution of federal funds to public charter schools; (4)  A summary of the criteria used by the charter school facilities funding working group, established pursuant to section 302D-29.5, in allocating facilities funding; (5)  A detailed breakdown of the allocation of funding through general funds and bond funds; (6)  A detailed list of the projects funded by general funds and bond funds; (7)  The status of funding for projects previously awarded; and (8)  A discussion of all board policies adopted in the previous year, including a detailed explanation as to whether each policy is or is not applicable to charter schools. (b)  No later than the opening day of each regular session of the legislature, the commission shall submit its report to the governor, legislature, and the public; provided that the commission shall first submit the report to the board, who shall review and approve the commission's report before the report is submitted to the governor, legislature, and the public." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.